apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="po/ne__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>nendu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nendu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>nu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ni</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>nimu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nite</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nenu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nia</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nianu</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ricev/e__vblex">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- temi/accadi CORSICAN WHY U NO USE STANDARDS -->
      <e><p><l>imu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ianu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erà</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ut</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>it</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sce/glie__vblex">
      <e><p><l>glie</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glie</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>gliendu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gliendu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>glu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gli</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gle</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gli</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- temi/accadi CORSICAN WHY U NO USE STANDARDS -->
      <e><p><l>glimu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glite</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glenu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>glia</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glianu</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>glierà</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glierete</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>lt</l><r>glie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dife/nde__vblex">
      <e><p><l>nde</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nde</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ndu</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ndi</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nde</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ndi</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>ndimu</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ndite</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ndenu</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ndia</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ndianu</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nderà</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>s</l><r>nde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="per/de__vblex">
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>du</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>di</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>dimu</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dite</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>denu</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>dia</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dianu</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>derà</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>s</l><r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ap/re__vblex">
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ru</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ri</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ri</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>rimu</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rite</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>renu</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ria</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rianu</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rerà</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ert</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>










    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="apre"><i>ap</i><par n="ap/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parte"><i>part</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riparte"><i>ripart</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sparte"><i>spart</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accade"><i>accad</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dibatte"><i>dibatt</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vinde"><i>vind</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riceve"><i>ricev</i><par n="ricev/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pone"><i>po</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prupone"><i>prupo</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prupone" r="LR"><p><l>prupu</l><r>prupo</r></p><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumpone"><i>cumpo</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oppone"><i>oppo</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripone"><i>ripo</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impone"><i>impo</i><par n="po/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sceglie"><i>sce</i><par n="sce/glie__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difende"><i>dife</i><par n="dife/nde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perde"><i>per</i><par n="per/de__vblex"/></e>
